District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-532

Eligibility.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-100, § 3, 29 DCR 969
Aug. 9, 1986, D.C. Law 6-136, § 2(a), 33 DCR 3796
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-243, § 20, 44 DCR 1142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-402.

Emergency Legislation

See note to § 4-531.